ja: 葉ゼラチングレード: ブロンズ; ゴールド; プラチナ; シルバー; チタン; その他
pl: Klasa żelatyny w listkach: Brązowa; Złota; Platynowa; Srebrna; Tytanowa; Inne
vi: Cấp độ gelatin lá: màu đồng; màu vàng; Bạch kim; màu bạc; Titan; Khác
tr: Yaprak jelatin kalitesi: Bronz; Altın; Platin; Gümüş; Titanyum; Diğer
hr-HR: Ocjena želatina u listovima: Brončana; Zlatna; Platinasta; Srebrna; Titanska; Ostalo
el: Βαθμός φύλλων ζελατίνης: Μπρούντζινη; Χρυσή; Πλατινένια; Ασημένια; Τιτανίου; Άλλο
en: Leaf gelatin grade: Bronze; Gold; Platinum; Silver; Titanium; Other
sv: Kvalitet på bladgelatin: Brons; Guld; Platina; Silver; Titan; Övrigt
ru: Сорт листового желатина: Бронзовый; Золотой; Платиновый; Серебряный; Титановый; Другое
cs: Jakost plátkové želatiny: Bronzová; Zlatá; Platinová; Stříbrná; Titanová; Jiné
bg-BG: Клас на листовия желатин: Бронзов; Златен; Платинен; Сребърен; Титанов; Друг
nl: Bladgelatine sterktegraad: Brons; Goud; Platina; Zilver; Titanium; Overig
ko: 판젤라틴 등급: 청동색; 금색; 플래티넘; 은색; 티타늄; 기타
th: เจลาตินใบไม้เกรดดี: ทองแดง; ทอง; แพลทินัม; เงิน; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 片狀明膠等級: 銅級; 金級; 白金級; 銀級; 鈦級; 其他
sk-SK: Trieda listovej želatíny: Bronzová; Zlatá; Platinová; Strieborná; Titánová; Iné
pt-PT: Grau da gelatina em folha: Bronze; Dourado; Platina; Prata; Titânio; Outro
fi: Lehtigelatiinin laatu: Pronssi; Kulta; Platina; Hopea; Titaani; Muu
fr: Grade de gélatine en feuilles: Bronze; Or; Platine; Argent; Titane; Autre
da: Klassificeringen af bladgelatine: Bronze; Guld; Platin; Sølv; Titanium; Andet
it: Grado della gelatina in fogli: Bronzo; Oro; Platino; Argento; Titanio; Altro
pt-BR: Gelatina em folhas grau: Bronze; Ouro; Platina; Prata; Titânio; Outro
nb: Gelatinkvalitet: Bronse; Gull; Platina; Sølv; Titan; Annet
zh-CN: 叶明胶等级: 青铜色; 金级; 铂金级; 银级; 钛级; 其他
sl-SI: Razred listnate želatine: Bronasta; Zlata; Platinasta; Srebrna; Titanova; Drugo
ro-RO: Gradul foilor de gelatină: Bronz; Aur; Platină; Argint; Titan; Altele
es: Grado de gelatina en hojas: Bronce; Oro; Platino; Plata; Titanio; Otro
hu: Lapzselatin minőségi fokozata: Bronz; Arany; Platina; Ezüst; Titán; Egyéb
de: Blattgelatine-Qualität: Bronze; Gold; Platin; Silber; Titan; Sonstige
lt-LT: Lakštinės želatinos klasė: Bronza; Auksas; Platina; Sidabras; Titanas; Kita